Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WASECA AREA CAREGIVER SERVICES.new text end new text begin $120,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Waseca Area Caregiver Services. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end